Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2208
Judicial records; duty to keep.

The clerk of the court shall keep the records, books and papers appertaining to the court, and record its proceedings.

R.S.1867, Code § 887, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8556;

C.S.1922, § 9507;

C.S.1929, § 20-2208;

R.S.1943, § 25-2208.

Section is mandatory and clerk must make complete record, though fees and costs not tendered. State v. Several Parcels of Land, 82 Neb. 51, 117 N.W. 450 (1908).

Clerk is liable to county for expense of replacing books lost through his negligence. Toncray v. Dodge County, 33 Neb. 802, 51 N.W. 235 (1892).